Utah statutes.
75-3-720.   Proceedings for review of employment of agents and compensation
of personal representatives and employees of estate.
After notice to all interested persons, on petition of an interested person or
on appropriate motion if administration is supervised, the propriety of
employment of any person by a personal representative, including any attorney,
auditor, investment advisor, or other specialized agent or assistant, the
reasonableness of the compensation of any person so employed, or the
reasonableness of the compensation determined by the personal representative
for the personal representative's own services, may be reviewed by the court.
Any person who has received excessive compensation from an estate for services
rendered may be ordered to make appropriate refunds.
